Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0313.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) The departments of health and human services and licensing and regulatory affairs are responsible for developing rules for the care and protection of children in organizations covered by this act and for promulgating these rules according to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (2) The department shall establish an ad hoc committee for each type of child care organization as defined in this act when it is formulating or amending rules under this act. The committee shall consist of not less than 12 members, and must include representatives of the following groups and agencies: (a) Department of health and human services. (b) Department of licensing and regulatory affairs, bureau of fire services, and state fire safety board. (c) Department of education. (d) Representatives of organizations affected by this act. (e) Parents of children affected by this act. (3) A majority of the members appointed to the committee established by subsection (2) must be representatives of organizations affected by this act and parents of children affected by this act. The committee shall serve during the period of the formulation of rules, shall have responsibility for making recommendations on the content of rules, and shall recommend to the department revisions in proposed rules at any time before the rules are promulgated. (4) The rules promulgated under this act shall must be restricted to the following: (a) The operation and conduct of child care organizations and the responsibility the organizations assume for child care. (b) The character, suitability, health, training, and qualifications of applicants and other persons directly responsible for the care and welfare of children served. (c) The character and health of household members. (d) The general financial ability and competence of applicants to provide necessary care for children and to maintain prescribed standards. (e) The number of individuals or staff required to ensure adequate supervision and care of the children received. (f) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of adequate fire prevention and health standards to provide for the physical comfort, care, and well-being of the children received. The rules with respect to fire prevention and fire safety do not apply to a child care center established and operated by an intermediate school board, the board of a local school district, or by the board or governing body of a state approved nonpublic in a school, if the either of the following applies: (i) The child care center is located in a school building that is approved by the bureau of fire services created in section 1b of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.1b, or other similar authority as provided in section 3 of 1937 PA 306, MCL 388.853, for school purposes and is in compliance with the school fire safety rules, R 29.1901 to R 29.1934 of the Michigan Administrative Code, as determined by the bureau of fire services or a fire inspector certified under section 2b of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.2b. (ii) The superintendent of the intermediate school district or local school district certifies that the school building has the approval described under subparagraph (i). (g) Provisions for food, clothing, educational opportunities, programs, equipment, and individual supplies to assure the healthy physical, emotional, and mental development of children served. (h) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of children served. (i) Maintenance of records pertaining to admission, progress, health, and discharge of children. (j) Filing of reports with the department. (k) Discipline of children. (l) Transportation safety. (5) Rules once promulgated are subject to major review by an ad hoc committee not less than once every 5 years and must be reviewed biennially by the department. The ad hoc committee shall be established by the department, shall consist of not less than 12 members, and shall include representatives of the groups and agencies indicated in subsection (2). The ad hoc committee shall hold at least 2 public hearings regarding the review of rules and shall report its recommendations regarding rules to the appropriate committees of the legislature. (6) Unless there is an immediate federal obligation or an immediate risk to health and safety as determined by the department, a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home that is controlled by a rule promulgated under this act has not less than 90 days after a rule is promulgated to become compliant with the rule. Sec. 3. (1) The rules promulgated by the department under this act shall must be used by the department, the bureau of fire services, and local authorities in the inspection of and reporting on child care organizations covered by this act. The inspection of the health and fire safety of child care organizations shall must be completed by department staff, the bureau of fire services, or local authorities upon request of the department, or according to subsection (2). (2) If an inspection is not conducted according to subsection (1), a person owning or operating or who that proposes to own or operate a child care organization must comply with either of the following: (a) The person may enter into a contract with a local authority or other person qualified by the department to conduct an inspection according to subsection (1) and pay for that inspection after an inspection is completed according to this subsection. (b) If the child care organization is a child care center in a school building, the person provides the department with certification from the superintendent of the intermediate school district or local school district that the health and fire safety described under subsection (1) is sufficient in the school building. (3) The rules promulgated by the department for foster family homes and foster family group homes shall must be used by a child placing agency or governmental unit when investigating and certifying a foster family home or a foster family group home. (4) Inspection reports completed by state agencies, local authorities, and child placing agencies shall must be furnished to the department and shall will become a part of its evaluation for licensing of organizations covered by this act. After careful consideration of the reports and consultation where necessary, the department shall assume responsibility for the final determination of the issuance, denial, revocation, or provisional nature of licenses issued under this act. A report of findings shall must be furnished to the applicant or licensee. Sec. 5n. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (13), when a person, partnership, firm, corporation, association, governmental organization, or nongovernmental organization applies for or applies to renew a license to operate a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home under section 5m and before a group child care home or family child care home allows an individual to be a member of the household, or a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home allows an individual to become a child care staff member, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Review its database of individuals with previous disciplinary action within a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home or an adult foster care facility. (b) Conduct a search of the individual through the national sex offender registry. (c) Request a search of the individual through all state criminal registries or repositories for any states of residence in the past 5 years. (d) Request that the department of state police perform a criminal history check on the individual, child care staff member, or adult member of the household. (2) If the individual, child care staff member, or adult member of the household has resided out of the United States within the preceding 5 years, equivalent clearances of those described in subsection (1)(b) and (d) and section 5q from each country must be provided, if available. If the country does not have the equivalent clearance, the individual must sign a self-certifying statement that he or she the individual is not ineligible to receive a license, to be an adult member of the household, or to be a child care staff member as prescribed by sections 5q and 5r. An individual who provides or is determined to have provided false information or knowingly omits information in the self-certification statement is ineligible for that application. (3) Each individual listed in subsection (1) shall give written consent at the time of the license application and before a group child care home or family child care home allows an individual to be a member of the household, or before becoming a child care staff member to allow the department of state police to conduct the criminal history check required under subsection (1). The department shall require the individual to submit his or her the individual's fingerprints to the department of state police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the criminal history check as required in subsection (1). (4) The department shall request a criminal history check required under this section on a form and in the manner prescribed by the department of state police. (5) Within a reasonable time after receiving a complete request for a criminal history check on a person under this section, the department of state police shall conduct the criminal history check and provide a report of the results to the department. The report shall must contain any criminal history record information on the person maintained by the department of state police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (6) The department of state police may charge the department a fee for a criminal history check required under this section that does not exceed the actual and reasonable cost of conducting the check. The If the department does not receive a sufficient appropriation in a fiscal year to cover the cost of conducting each check required under this section, the department may pass along to the individual fingerprinted the actual cost or fee charged by the department of state police, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or a vendor approved by the department of state police for performing a criminal history check during that fiscal year required under this section. (7) The department shall provide whether the individual is eligible or ineligible as provided by sections 5q and 5r within 45 days after the date on which the request was submitted. (8) The individual may serve as a child care staff member pending the results of the record and database checks required by this section and section 5q if the individual is supervised at all times. (9) Within 45 days after the date on which the request was submitted, the department shall provide a statement to the child care center, group child care home, or family child care home that indicates whether the individual is eligible or ineligible to be, a licensee, an adult member of the household, or a child care staff member as provided under sections 5q and 5r without revealing any disqualifying crime or other related information regarding the individual. (10) If the individual is ineligible due to the records or database checks required under this section and section 5q, the department shall provide information related to each disqualifying item in a report to the individual who has been determined ineligible. (11) An individual who has been determined to be ineligible as provided under sections 5q and 5r may request a redetermination by the department if he or she the individual believes that the basis for the ineligible determination is inaccurate. The individual shall file the request for redetermination with the department within 30 calendar days after receiving the written notice that he or she was determined to be ineligible. If an individual has been determined to be ineligible based upon a conviction that has been expunged or set aside or a central registry case that has been expunged, the individual shall provide the supporting court, law enforcement, or department of health and human services, or equivalent department from another state, documents along with the request for redetermination. The individual shall not be determined to be ineligible based upon a conviction that has been set aside or expunged or a central registry case that has been expunged. The department shall review the request and issue a written decision within 30 business days after receiving the request for redetermination. The decision of the department is final. (12) Each ineligible individual shall be given instructions about how to complete the request for redetermination process as provided in subsection (11). (13) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, not later than September 30, 2017, every child care center licensee, group child care home licensee, family child care home licensee, child care staff member, and adult member of the household shall submit his or her the individual's fingerprints to the department of state police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to carry out the records and database checks required under this section and section 5q. If the department of education obtains an extension on the implementation of this program from the federal government, the provisions of this section may be implemented no later than September 30, 2018. (14) If a licensee, licensee designee, or program director of a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home applying for a new license or to renew a license to operate a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home has previously undergone a criminal history check required under subsections (1) and (13) and has remained continuously licensed after the criminal history check has been performed, that licensee, licensee designee, or program director of a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home is not required to submit to another criminal history check upon renewal of, or application for, the license obtained under this act. (15) Upon consent of an applicant as required in subsection (3) and upon request from a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home, the department shall review the information received from the criminal history check, if any, and notify the requesting child care center, group child care home, or family child care home of the information in the manner prescribed in subsection (7). Until the Federal Bureau of Investigation implements an automatic notification system as outlined in section 5k, a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home may rely on the criminal history record information provided by the department under this subsection and a new request as provided under this section is not necessary if all of the following requirements are met: (a) The criminal history check was conducted during the immediately preceding 5-year period. (b) The applicant has been continuously employed by a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home since the criminal history check was conducted in compliance with this section. (c) The applicant can provide evidence acceptable to the department that he or she the applicant has been a resident of this state for the immediately preceding 5-year period. (16) The checks and clearances required in subsection (1)(a) to (c) and section 5q shall must be updated at least every 5 years if the individual has been continuously licensed, has continuously been serving as a child care staff member, or has continuously been an adult member of the household. Sec. 10. (1) The department may investigate, inspect, and examine conditions of a child care organization and may investigate and examine the licensee's books and records. The licensee must cooperate with the department's investigation, inspection, and examination by doing all of the following: (a) Admitting members of the department into the child care organization and furnishing all reasonable facilities for thorough examination of its books, records, and reports. (b) Allowing the department to perform routine investigative functions during the course of an investigation, inspection, or examination. Routine investigative functions include, but are not limited to, interviewing potential witnesses, such as staff and household members, and taking photographs to assess and document the conditions of the child care organization and its compliance with this act and the rules promulgated under this act. (c) Providing accurate and truthful information to the department, and encouraging witnesses, such as staff and household members, to provide accurate and truthful information to the department. (2) The Except for a child care center for which a superintendent provides certification that a health or fire protection requirement under this act is met, a licensee shall allow the department, the bureau of fire services, or local authorities access to the child care organization to carry out the provisions of this act and rules promulgated under this act related to the health or fire protection of children. (3) A licensee shall keep the records the department prescribes regarding each child in its control and care and shall report to the department, if requested, the facts the department requires with reference to the children upon forms furnished by the department. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and subsection (4), records regarding children and facts compiled about children and their parents and relatives are confidential and disclosure of this information must be properly safeguarded by the child care organization, the department, and any other entity in possession of the information. Records that are confidential under this section are available to 1 or more of the following: (a) A standing or select committee or appropriations subcommittee of either house of the legislature having jurisdiction over protective services matters for children, according to section 7 of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.627. (b) The child advocate established in section 3 of the office of the child advocate act, 1994 PA 204, MCL 722.923. (c) An employee of an agency, bureau, division, or other entity within the department, or an employee of a child caring institution, or a child placing agency contracted with the department, but only to the extent necessary for the administration of child welfare services in each case. The director of the agency responsible for child welfare services, or the director's designee, is responsible for authorizing an employee to have access to the records according to this subdivision and for ensuring that access is given only to the extent necessary. (d) A national accreditation program, only while on-site, for the purpose of review and accreditation of a child welfare program, agency, or organization. (4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) and sections 5 and 7(2) of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.625 and 722.627, information or records in the possession of the department or the department of licensing and regulatory affairs may be shared to the extent necessary for the proper functioning of the department or the department of licensing and regulatory affairs in administering child welfare or child care licensing under this act or in an investigation conducted under section 43b of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.43b. Information or records shared under this subsection shall must not be released by the department or the department of licensing and regulatory affairs unless otherwise permitted under this act or other state or federal law. Neither the department nor the department of licensing and regulatory affairs shall release or open for inspection any document, report, or record authored by or obtained from another agency or organization unless 1 of the conditions of section 7(5) of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.627, applies. (5) A child care center, group child care home, or family child care home licensee shall provide the department with child information cards for all children presently enrolled for care, as requested by the department, whenever the department initiates or conducts an investigation, inspection, or assessment. If the investigation, inspection, or assessment results in the department pursuing disciplinary action as provided by section 11, the child care center, group child care home, or family child care home licensee must provide the department with child information cards for newly enrolled children for the pendency of the proposed disciplinary action. (6) The department may suspend, deny, revoke, or refuse to renew a license of the child care organization if the licensee does not cooperate with an investigation, inspection, or examination under this section. (7) An audio or video recording provided to the department by a licensee under this section is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. Sec. 11c. (1) In the case of a disaster, a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home may temporarily operate at an unlicensed location under this section. The requirements to temporarily operate at an unlicensed location under this section are as follows: (a) The child care center, group child care home, or family child care home cannot operate in a new location until after the department has conducted an inspection and approved the new location. (b) For Except as provided in this subdivision, for a child care center, a fire safety inspection, an environmental health inspection, and, if necessary, a lead hazard risk assessment, and, for a group child care home or family child care home, an environmental health inspection, if necessary, are conducted within 45 days of the proposal of the new location. A fire safety inspection and an environmental health inspection under this subdivision are not required for a child care center located in a school building if the superintendent of the intermediate school district or local school district certifies that the location is safe. If any of the inspections find an inspection required under this subdivision finds the new location to be unsafe, the child care center, group child care home, or family child care home must discontinue operation in that new location. (2) If the child care center, group child care home, or family child care home will remain at the new location, the licensee must apply for and obtain a new license within 1 year of moving to the new location. (3) The department shall determine what constitutes a disaster under this section.